Utah statutes.
63C-9-602.   Transfer of certain historical items.

(1) (a)  A state agency or other state entity that possesses a state-owned item identified by the executive director and the board as an item of historical significance that was at one time located in the capitol hill facilities shall transfer the item to the inventory of the board at the direction of the executive director not later than the 60th day after the date that the executive director notifies the agency or entity.

(b)  The state agency or other state entity shall subsequently transfer physical possession of the item to the board in accordance with policies and procedures established by the board.

(2)  This section does not apply to records or documents in the custody of the Division of Archives and Records Service.



Enacted by Chapter 285, 1998 General Session

